it: Tipo di direct box: Attivo; Ibrido attivo valvolare; Interfaccia bluetooth; Ricevitore bluetooth; Digitale; Load box; Modellazione; Passivo; Reamplificazione; Splitter; Tubo; Altro
nb: Direct box type: Aktiv; Aktiv rør-hybrid; Bluetooth-grensesnitt; Bluetooth-mottaker; Digital; Lastboks; Modellering; Passiv; Reamp; Splitter; Slange; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de direct box: Ativo; Híbrida ativa com válvulas; Interface Bluetooth; Recetor Bluetooth; Digital; Caixa de carga; Modelagem; Passivo; Reamplificação; Divisor; Tubo; Outro
en: Direct box type: Active; Active tube-hybrid; Bluetooth interface; Bluetooth receiver; Digital; Load box; Modeling; Passive; Reamp; Splitter; Tube; Other
pl: Typ direct boxa: Aktywna; Aktywny hybrydowo-lampowy; Interfejs Bluetooth; Odbiornik Bluetooth; Cyfrowy; Load box; Modelowanie; Pasywny; Reamp; Rozdzielacz; Świetlówka; Inne
th: ประเภทไดเร็คบ็อกซ์: แบบแอกทีฟ; แอคทีฟหลอดไฮบริด; อินเตอร์เฟซบลูทูธ; ตัวรับบลูทูธ; ดิจิทัล; โหลดบ็อกซ์; การสร้างโมเดล; แบบพาสซีฟ; รีแอมป์; สปลิตเตอร์; หลอด; อื่นๆ
ja: ダイレクトボックスタイプ: アクティブ; アクティブ真空管ハイブリッド; Bluetooth インターフェース; Bluetooth レシーバー; デジタル; ロードボックス; モデリング; パッシブ; リアンプ; スプリッター; チューブ; その他
sl-SI: Tip direktne škatle: Aktivna; Aktivni cevni hibrid; Bluetooth vmesnik; Bluetooth sprejemnik; Digitalna; Obremenitvena škatla; Modeliranje; Pasivna; Ponovna ojačitev; Razdelilnik; Tuba; Drugo
fr: Type de boîtier direct: Actif; Hybride active à tube; Interface Bluetooth; Récepteur Bluetooth; Numérique; Boîte de charge; Modélisation; Passif; Réamplification; Diviseur; Tube; Autre
cs: Typ direct boxu: Aktivní; Aktivní elektronkový-hybridní; Bluetooth rozhraní; Bluetooth přijímač; Digitální; Zátěžový box; Modelování; Pasivní; Reamp; Rozbočovač; Tuba; Jiné
lt-LT: Tiesioginės dėžės tipas: Aktyvus; Aktyvus lempinis hibridinis; Bluetooth sąsaja; Bluetooth imtuvas; Skaitmeninis; Apkrovos dėžė; Modeliavimas; Pasyvus; Pakartotinis stiprinimas; Dalytuvas; Vamzdis; Kita
vi: Loại hộp trực tiếp: Chủ động; Lai đèn chủ động; Giao diện Bluetooth; Bộ thu Bluetooth; Kỹ thuật số; Hộp tải; Mô hình hóa; Thụ động; Reamp; Bộ chia; Ống; Khác
de: DI‑Box‑Typ: Aktiv; Aktiv Röhren-Hybrid; Bluetooth-Schnittstelle; Bluetooth-Empfänger; Digital; Load Box; Modellieren; Passiv; Reamp; Splitter; Rohr; Sonstiges
el: Τύπος direct box: Ενεργή; Ενεργό υβριδικό με λυχνία; Διεπαφή Bluetooth; Δέκτης Bluetooth; Ψηφιακό; Κουτί φορτίου; Κατασκευή μινιατούρας; Παθητική; Reamp; Διαχωριστής; Μακαρόνι; Άλλο
da: Type af DI-boks: Aktiv; Aktiv rør-hybrid; Bluetooth-grænseflade; Bluetooth-modtager; Digital; Load-boks; Modellering; Passiv; Reamp; Splitter; Tube; Andet
ro-RO: Tip cutie directă: Activă; Hibrid activ cu tub; Interfață Bluetooth; Receptor Bluetooth; Digital; Cutie de sarcină; Modelare; Pasiv; Reamplificare; Divizor; Tub; Altele
ko: 다이렉트 박스 유형: 액티브; 액티브 진공관 하이브리드; 블루투스 인터페이스; 블루투스 수신기; 디지털; 로드 박스; 모델링; 수동; 리앰프; 스플리터; 튜브; 기타
zh-TW: DI 盒類型: 主動; 主動式真空管混合; 藍牙介面; 藍牙接收器; 數位; 負載箱; 建模; 被動式; 重新放大器; 分配器; 管狀; 其他
bg-BG: Тип директна кутия: Активна; Активен лампово-хибриден; Bluetooth интерфейс; Bluetooth приемник; Цифрова; Товарна кутия; Моделиране; Пасивна; Реамп; Сплитер; Тръба; Други
hu: Direct box típus: Aktív; Aktív csöves-hibrid; Bluetooth interfész; Bluetooth vevő; Digitális; Terhelő doboz; Modellezési; Passzív; Reamp; Elosztó; Cső; Egyéb
es: Tipo de caja directa: Activo; Híbrida activa con válvulas; Interfaz Bluetooth; Receptor Bluetooth; Digital; Caja de carga; Modelado; Pasivo; Reamplificación; Divisor; Tubo; Otros
sv: Direktboxtyp: Aktiv; Aktiv rörhybrid; Bluetooth-gränssnitt; Bluetooth-mottagare; Digitalt; Lastbox; Modellande; Passiv; Reamp; Splitter; Tub; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ direct boxu: Aktívny; Aktívny elektrónkový hybrid; Bluetooth rozhranie; Bluetooth prijímač; Digitálny; Záťažový box; Modelovanie; Pasívny; Reamp; Rozdeľovač; Tuba; Iné
nl: Direct box type: Actief; Actieve buis-hybride; Bluetooth-interface; Bluetooth-ontvanger; Digitaal; Belastingbox; Modelleren; Passief; Reamp; Splitter; Tube; Andere
pt-BR: Tipo de direct box: Ativo; Híbrido valvulado ativo; Interface Bluetooth; Receptor Bluetooth; Digital; Load box; Modelagem; Passivo; Reamp; Divisor; Tubo; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta direktne kutije: Aktivno; Aktivni cijevni hibrid; Bluetooth sučelje; Bluetooth prijemnik; Digitalna; Kutija opterećenja; Modeliranje; Pasivni; Reamp; Razdjelnik; Cijev; Ostalo
ru: Тип директ-бокса: Активный; Активный ламповый гибрид; Bluetooth-интерфейс; Bluetooth-приемник; Цифровые; Нагрузочный бокс; Моделирование; Пассивный; Реампер; Разветвитель; Трубчатый; Другой
fi: Suorakytkentärasian tyyppi: Aktiivinen; Aktiivinen putki-hybridi; Bluetooth-rajapinta; Bluetooth-vastaanotin; Digitaalinen; Kuormaboxi; Muovailu; Passiivinen; Reamp; Haaroitin; Putkilo; Muu
zh-CN: 直插盒类型: 活动型; 主动电子管混合式; 蓝牙接口; 蓝牙接收器; 数字版; 负载箱; 造型; 被动; 重放大; 分配器; 管状滑道; 其他
tr: Direct box tipi: Aktif; Aktif tüp-hibrit; Bluetooth arayüzü; Bluetooth alıcı; Dijital; Yük kutusu; Modelleme; Pasif; Reamp; Bölücü; Tüp; Diğer